District of Columbia statutes.
7-2507.06a

Seizure and forfeiture of conveyances.

Any conveyance in which a person or persons transport, possess, or conceal any firearm, as that term is defined in § 7-2501.01, or in any manner use to facilitate a violation of § 7-2502.02 or § 22-4503 or § 22-4504, is subject to forfeiture pursuant to the standards and procedures set forth in D.C. Law 20-278.

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title VII, § 706a
as added June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-273, § 2, 43 DCR 6168
June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-274, § 19(b), 44 DCR 1232
June 16, 2015, D.C. Law 20-278, § 302, 62 DCR 1920
1981 Ed., § 6-2376.1.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-278 rewrote the section.
For temporary addition of section, see § 2 of the Zero Tolerance for Guns Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-390, August 26, 1996, 43 DCR 4986), § 2 of the Zero Tolerance for Guns Congressional Adjournment Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-436, December 4, 1996, 43 DCR 6651), and § 2 of the Zero Tolerance for Guns Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-35, March 11, 1997, 44 DCR 1928).
D.C. Law 20-278, referred to in this section, enacted Chapter 3 of Title 41 (§ 41-301 et seq.), made amendments to the criminal offenses in §§ 48-901.02 and 48-905.02, and made conforming amendments to §§ 7-2507.06a, 8-905, 22-902, 22-1705, 22-2723, 32-1343, 48-905.03, and 50-1501.04.